Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.450

Electrification of transportation plan—Considerations—Incentive programs.

(1) The governing authority of an electric utility formed under this chapter may adopt an electrification of transportation plan that, at a minimum, establishes a finding that utility outreach and investment in the electrification of transportation infrastructure does not increase net costs to ratepayers in excess of one-quarter of one percent.

(2) In adopting an electrification of transportation plan under subsection (1) of this section, the governing authority may consider some or all of the following: (a) The applicability of multiple options for electrification of transportation across all customer classes; (b) the impact of electrification on the utility's load, and whether demand response or other load management opportunities, including direct load control and dynamic pricing, are operationally appropriate; (c) system reliability and distribution system efficiencies; (d) interoperability concerns, including the interoperability of hardware and software systems in electrification of transportation proposals; and (e) overall customer experience.

(3) An electric utility formed under this chapter may, upon making a determination in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, offer incentive programs in the electrification of transportation for its customers, including the promotion of electric vehicle adoption and advertising programs to promote the utility's services, incentives, or rebates.

[ 2019 c 109 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 287; 2019 c 109: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Programs for the electrification of transportation have the potential to allow electric utilities to optimize the use of electric grid infrastructure, improve the management of electric loads, and better manage the integration of variable renewable energy resources. Depending upon each utility's unique circumstances, electrification of transportation programs may provide cost-effective energy efficiency, through more efficient use of energy resources, and more efficient use of the electric delivery system. Electrification of transportation may result in cost savings and benefits for all ratepayers.

(2) State policy can achieve the greatest return on investment in reducing greenhouse gas emissions and improving air quality by expediting the transition to alternative fuel vehicles, including electric vehicles. Potential benefits associated with electrification of transportation include the monetization of environmental attributes associated with carbon reduction in the transportation sector.

(3) Legislative clarity is important for utilities to offer programs and services, including incentives, in the electrification of transportation for their customers. It is the intent of the legislature to allow all utilities to support transportation electrification to further the state's policy goals and achieve parity among all electric utilities, so each electric utility, depending on its unique circumstances, can determine its appropriate role in the development of electrification of transportation infrastructure." [ 2019 c 287 s 4; 2019 c 109 s 1.]